da: Tesitype: Indbygget; Ingen; Aftagelig; Andet
zh-CN: 浸泡器类型: 内置; 无; 可拆卸; 其他
el: Τύπος εγχυτήρα: Ενσωματωμένος; Κανένας; Αφαιρούμενος; Άλλο
ko: 인퓨저 유형: 내장; 없음; 제거 가능; 기타
hr-HR: Vrsta infuzora: Ugrađeni; Nema; Uklonjivo; Ostalo
nb: Infusjonstype: Innebygd; Ingen; Avtakbar; Annet
it: Tipo di infusore: Integrato; Nessuna; Rimovibili; Altro
nl: Infusertype: Ingebouwd; Geen; Uitneembaar; Overig
pl: Typ zaparzacza: Do zabudowy; Brak; Wymienne; Pozostałe
zh-TW: 濾茶器類型: 內建; 無; 可拆式; 其他
tr: İnfüzyon aparatı tipi: Yerleşik; Yok; Çıkarılabilir; Diğer
vi: Loại lõi lọc: Tích hợp; Không có; Tháo rời được; Khác
ja: インフューザーのタイプ: 内蔵; なし; 取り外し可能; その他
de: Typ des Einsatzes: Eingebaut; Keine; Abtrennbar; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Tipul infuzorului: Încorporat; Niciuna; Reutilizabil; Altele
fi: Hauduttimen tyyppi: Sisäänrakennettu; Ei mitään; Irrotettava; Muu
th: ประเภทของที่กรอง: แบบในตัว; ไม่มี; ถอดออกได้; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Tipo de infusor: Incorporado; Nenhum; Removível; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta infuzerja: Vgradni; Brez; Odstranljivo; Druga
pt-PT: Tipo de infusor: Incorporado; Nenhum; Removível; Outro
fr: Type d’infuseur: Intégré; Aucune; Repositionnable; Autre
hu: Infúzor típusa: Beépített; Egyik sem; Eltávolítható; Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ infúzora: Zabudovaný; Žiadny; Odnímateľný; Iné
en: Infuser type: Built-in; None; Removable; Other
es: Tipo de infusor: Incorporado; Ninguno; Despegables; Otros
lt-LT: Infuzoriaus tipas: Įmontuotas; Nėra; Nuimamas; Kita
sv: Typ av infuser: Inbyggd; Inga; Avtagbar; Övrigt
cs: Typ infuzéru: Vestavěné; Bez infuzéru; Vyjímatelné; Jiné
bg-BG: Тип инфузер: Вградено; Няма; Подвижно; Друго
ru: Тип заварочного устройства: Встроенный; Нет; Съемный; Другой